Washington statutes.
RCW 2.10.080

Funds and securities.

(1) The state treasurer shall be the custodian of all funds and securities of the retirement system. Disbursements from this fund shall be made by the state treasurer upon receipt of duly authorized vouchers.

(2) The state treasurer is hereby authorized and directed to deposit any portion of the funds of the retirement system not needed for immediate use in the same manner and subject to all the provisions of law with respect to the deposit of state funds by such treasurer. All investment income earned by such portion of the retirement system's funds as may be deposited by the state treasurer in pursuance of authority herewith given shall be collected by him or her and placed to the credit of the retirement fund, less the allocation to the state treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.

(3) For the purpose of providing amounts to be used to defray the cost of administration, the judicial retirement board shall ascertain at the beginning of each biennium and request from the legislature an appropriation sufficient to cover estimated expenses for the said biennium.

[ 2012 c 187 s 16; 1991 sp.s. c 13 s 114; 1981 c 3 s 22; 1973 1st ex.s. c 103 s 1; 1971 ex.s. c 267 s 8.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—Severability—1991 sp.s. c 13: See notes following RCW 18.08.240.

Intent of amendment—1981 c 3: "The amendment of RCW 2.10.080, 2.12.070, 41.26.060, 41.26.070, and 41.40.080 by this 1980 act is intended solely to provide for the investment of state funds and is not intended to alter the administration of the affected retirement systems by the department of retirement systems under chapter 41.50 RCW." [ 1981 c 3 s 44.]

Effective dates—Severability—1981 c 3: See notes following RCW 43.33A.010.

Severability—1973 1st ex.s. c 103: "If any provision of this 1973 amendatory act, or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act, or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1973 1st ex.s. c 103 s 20.]